Hawaii, session 2026, GM1370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that there is limited
access to mental health care treatment services for residents
across the State. The delivery of comprehensive, accessible,
and affordable mental health care has been demonstrably enhanced
by collaborative practice among licensed clinical psychologists
with prescriptive authority and medical doctors in federal
facilities and programs and in states that have authorized
prescriptive authority for psychologists. The legislature finds
that providing limited prescriptive authority to qualified,
licensed clinical psychologists, subject to supervision by a
licensed medical doctor, could help make comprehensive mental
health care more accessible to medically underserved residents
of the State. The legislature acknowledges that the Health
Resources and Services Administration of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services has officially
designated much of the State, including isolated rural locations
2026-2512 SB847 GDI SMA.docx
iiiiiiiwiiiigiinHiuliiiHig

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
and urban areas with high population densities, as a mental
health professional shortage area. This designation highlights
the critical need for expansion of available mental health
services and development of a corps of mental health
professionals to serve the currently unmet needs of Hawaii's
population.
The legislature has previously authorized prescription
privileges for advanced practice registered nurses,
optometrists, dentists, podiatrists, and physician assistants.
These practitioners have been granted prescriptive authority
based on demonstration of specific training, education, and
practical competency. Education and training criteria, such as
passage of national board examinations and degree and minimum
experience requirements, have worked well to assure quality of
services. Limitations on authority including the use of
approved formularies, limited practice areas, and prohibitions
on accepting or distributing drug samples have served to deter
abuses in the system and to prevent the inappropriate practice
of general medicine. Prescriptive authority for non-physician
practitioners with varying types of limitations and supervision
2026-2512 SB847 GDI SMA.docx 2
IHMIIIIIIIigilliUllllHIIIIH

Page 3
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
requirements has proven manageable and has expanded access to
important health care services for patients across the State.
Clinical psychologists with appropriate training have been
allowed to prescribe medications to active duty military
personnel and their families in federal facilities and the
federal Indian health service program for years. In recent
years, Colorado, Idaho, Illinois, Iowa, Louisiana, New Mexico,
and Utah have adopted legislation authorizing prescriptive
authority for appropriately trained psychologists without regard
to the service setting.
Since 2000, psychologists in Hawaii have received
psychopharmacological training through the Tripier Army Medical
Center psychology training program. These psychologists have
actively collaborated with primary care physicians to provide
combined therapy and psychopharmacological care to medically
underserved patient populations at eleven federally qualified
health centers: Bay Clinic, Hana, Molokai, Kauai, Waianae,
Kalihi-Palama, Waimanalo, Koolauloa, West Hawaii, Kokua Kalihi
Valley, and Waikiki, as well as a Native Hawaiian health care
system clinic located in a federally designated medically
underserved area on Molokai.
2026-2512 SB847 CDl SMA.docx
liiiimHDimiuiiniiii

Page 4
S.B. NO. SS*
C.D. 1
The American Psychological Association has developed a
model curriculum for a master’s degree in psychopharmacology for
the education and training of prescribing psychologists.
Independent evaluations of the United States Department of
Defense psychopharmacological demonstration project by the
United States General Accounting Office, now known as the
Government Accountability Office, and the American College of
Neuropsychopharmacology, as well as the experiences of Idaho,
Illinois, Iowa, Louisiana, and New Mexico, have demonstrated
that appropriately trained clinical psychologists can prescribe
psychotropic medications safely and effectively.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish a three-year pilot program to allow
qualified psychologists under the supervision of a
supervising physician or psychiatrist to prescribe
certain psychotropic medications for the treatment of
mental illness to patients between the ages of
eighteen and sixty-five who are under the
psychologist's care at a federally qualified health
center located in the county of Kauai or county of
Hawaii; and
2026-2512 SB847 GDI SMA.docx
IIHIUIHIIIHiin

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Require the state health planning and development
agency to submit a report to the legislature to
determine whether the pilot program should be
expanded, made permanent statewide, or terminated.
PART II
SECTION 2. (a) There is established a three-year pilot
program to be administered by the state health planning and
development agency, in partnership with the board of psychology,
to allow clinical psychologists licensed pursuant to chapter
465, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to prescribe psychotropic
medications under the supervision of a supervising physician or
psychiatrist only to patients between the ages of eighteen and
sixty-five years who are being treated by the psychologist at a
federally qualified health center located in the county of Kauai
or the county of Hawaii; provided that psychotropic medications
prescribed under this pilot program shall be eligible for
medicaid reimbursement to the extent such prescriptions would
otherwise be eligible if prescribed by a physician or
psychiatrist.
2026-2512 SB847 GDI SMA.docx 5

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) A licensed clinical psychologist shall be eligible to
apply to participate in the pilot program established pursuant
to this Act if the psychologist:
(1) Meets the requirements for licensure set forth in
section 465-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes;
(2) Completed specialized education and training in
preparation for prescriptive practice approved by the
Tkmerican Psychological Association and the board of
psychology;
(3) Has passed the Psychopharmacology Examination for
Psychologists or an equivalent national examination
approved by the board of psychology that is relevant
to establishing competence for prescriptive practice;
(4) Is employed by, including as a contract provider, a
federally qualified health center as defined in title
42 United States Code section 1396d located in the
county of Kauai or county of Hawaii; and
(5) Meets any other requirements established by the board
of psychology.
(c) The pilot program established pursuant to this Act
shall be a three-year program that shall allow participating
2026-2512 SB847 CDl SMA.docx
imuiiHiiiiiniiHiiHiiiiiH

Page?
S.B. NO.
^2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
psychologists to prescribe psychotropic medications under a
supervising physician or psychiatrist.
(d) The board of psychology shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to implement the purpose of
this Act.
(e) The state health planning and development agency shall
submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including
any proposed legislation, on the pilot program to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular session of 2029. The report shall include a
recommendation on whether to:
(1) Expand the pilot program to other underserved areas in
the State;
(2) Make prescriptive authority for qualified
psychologists permanent statewide; or
(3) Permanently end the pilot program.
(f) For the purposes of this Act:
"Prescriptive authority" means the authority to prescribe,
administer, discontinue, or distribute without charge, drugs or
controlled substances recognized in or customarily used in the
diagnosis, treatment, and management of individuals with
2026-2512 33847 GDI SMA.docx 7
uHiiniiniiiHiiDiiiiiiiii

Page 8
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
psychiatric, mental, cognitive, nervous, emotional, or
behavioral disorders, or other procedures directly related
thereto within the scope of practice of psychology in accordance
with rules adopted by the board of psychology.
"Psychopharmacology" means the use of psychoactive drugs in
the treatment and control of mental disorders or psychiatric
disease.
"Psychotropic medication" means only those agents related
to the diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorders
including controlled substances but not including narcotics.
"Supervising physician or psychiatrist" means a medically
trained and licensed physician or psychiatrist who accepts
professional responsibility for the provision of
psychopharmacology by a psychologist certified to prescribe.
PART III
SECTION 3. Section 329-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read:
""Psychologist certified to prescribe" means a person
approved by the board of psychology to participate in the pilot
2026-2512 SB847 CDl SMA.docx
iniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHiM

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
program established pursuant to Act, Session Laws of Hawaii
2026, but who is not authorized to request, receive, or sign for
professional controlled substance samples."
2. By amending the definition of "practitioner" to read:
""Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific
investigator, or other person licensed and registered
under section 329-32 to distribute, dispense, or
conduct research with respect to a controlled
substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this State;
(2) An advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority licensed and registered under
section 329-32 to prescribe and administer controlled
substances in the course of professional practice in
this State;
(3) A licensed midwife practicing as a certified midwife
registered under section 329-32 to prescribe and
administer controlled substances in the course of
professional practice in this State; [-aHd]
2026-2512 SB847 GDI SMA.docx 9
iiiiiiiiMiiMiiiiiiininii

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) A licensed psychologist certified to prescribe and
registered under section 329-32 to prescribe and
dispense controlled substances in accordance with the
requirements and limitations of the pilot program
established pursuant to Act, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2026; and
[(4)] (5) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution
licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to
or to administer a controlled substance in the course
of professional practice or research in this State."
PART IV
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2512 SB847 CDl SMA.docx 10
iiiiiiiiiiiiuiiniiiiiiiiiii

847
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this day of , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 847, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
94-26

SB No. 847, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives